New Jersey, session 221, A1972.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. The Department of Health shall develop and implement a plan to improve access to perinatal mood and anxiety disorder screening, referral, treatment, and support services. b.   The plan shall provide strategies to: (1) increase awareness among mental health care service providers who treat women experiencing perinatal mood and anxiety disorders with regard to the prevalence and effects of perinatal mood and anxiety disorders on women and children; (2) establish a referral network of mental health care providers and support services for women who are in need of perinatal mood and anxiety disorder treatment; (3) increase women's access to formal and informal peer support services, including access to certified peer specialists who have received training related to perinatal mood and anxiety disorders; (4) raise public awareness for, and reduce the stigma related to, perinatal mood and anxiety disorders; and (5)   provide available funds to perinatal mood and anxiety disorder screening, referral, treatment, and support. 2.    The Commissioner of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.